Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.410

Use of public assistance electronic benefit cards prohibited—Licensee to report violations—Suspension of license.

(1) Any licensee authorized under this chapter is prohibited from allowing the use of public assistance electronic benefit cards for the purpose of participating in any of the activities authorized under this chapter.

(2) Any licensee authorized under this chapter shall report to the department of social and health services any known violations of RCW 74.08.580.

(3) Any licensee authorized under this chapter is required to comply with RCW 74.08.580(2). If the licensee fails to comply with RCW 74.08.580(2), its license shall be immediately suspended until it complies with RCW 74.08.580(2). If the licensee remains otherwise eligible to be licensed, the commission may reinstate the license once the licensee has complied with RCW 74.08.580(2).

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 42 s 19; 2002 c 252 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 42: See notes following RCW 74.08A.260.

Finding—2011 1st sp.s. c 42: See note following RCW 74.04.004.